District of Columbia statutes.
26-831.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Affiliate” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(1).

(2)

“Appropriate financial institutions agency” means the federal or state agency with statutory authority over the financial institution activities of a financial institution.

(3)

“Capital” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(6).

(4)

“Commissioner” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(7).

(5)

“Department” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(9).

(6)

“Deposit” means a demand, time, or savings deposit, savings share account, withdrawable or repurchasable share, investment certificate, or other savings account or savings deposit account made by an individual, corporation, partnership, state or federal government unit, or any other government organization, without regard to the location of the depositor.

(7)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(8)

“District of Columbia Banking Code” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(14).

(9)

“Financial institution” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(18).

(10)

“Merchant bank” means a financial institution that is chartered or organized under the District of Columbia Banking Code as a merchant bank and is under the authority and supervision of the Commissioner.

(11)

“Subsidiary” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-551.02(24).

(12)

“Superior Court” means Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(13)

“Universal bank” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 26-1401.02(28).

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 302, 48 DCR 3244
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 2(i), 51 DCR 2817
D.C. Law 15-166 rewrote pars. (4) and (5) which had read as follows: (4) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Department of Banking and Financial Institutions. “(5) ‘Department’ means the Department of Banking and Financial Institutions.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(i) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).